Hawaii statutes.
[§98-4] Legal material in official
electronic record. (a) If an official publisher publishes legal material
only in an electronic record, the publisher shall:

(1) Designate the electronic record as official; and

(2) Comply with sections 98-5, 98-7, and 98-8.

(b) An official publisher that publishes legal
material in an electronic record and also publishes the material in a record
other than an electronic record may designate the electronic record as official
if the publisher complies with sections 98-5, 98-7, and 98-8. [L 2013, c 11, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next